Illinois, session 104th, HB4947.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 10-10 and by adding Section 7-10.4 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/7-10.4 new)7    Sec. 7-10.4. Waiver of personal service. Each petition or 8certificate of nomination may include as a part thereof, for 9each of the candidates filing, a voluntarily waiver of 10personal service of process under Section 10-10 and consent to 11notice of any objection by registered or certified mail and 12posting on the website of the unit of local government 13associated with the proper local election official or, if the 14unit of local government does not maintain a website, by 15posting at the principal office of the unit of local 16government.17    The waiver shall be subscribed and sworn to by such 18candidate before some officer authorized to take 19acknowledgment of deeds in this State and shall be in 20substantially the following form: 21United States of America ) 22                         ) ss 23State of Illinois        )  HB4947- 2 -LRB104 16917 SPS 30329 b1    I, ...., do swear that I am a candidate for the office of 2...., that I acknowledge and understand that an objection may 3be filed to my nomination papers in accordance with Section 410-8 of the Election Code, and that I hereby waive personal 5service of any call related to an objection sent in accordance 6with Section 10-10 of the Election Code. I knowingly and 7voluntarily consent to notice by registered or certified mail 8and posting of the call: 9        (1) on the publicly accessible website of the unit of 10    local government associated with the proper local election 11    official; or12        (2) if the unit of local government does not maintain 13    a website, at the principal office of the unit of local 14    government associated with the proper local election 15    official. 16    I further acknowledge that the registered or certified 17mail and posting shall constitute due and sufficient notice 18under the Election Code and that I shall have the 19responsibility to monitor such posting for notice of any 20objection or scheduled hearing. 21.......................22    Subscribed and sworn to by me on (insert date).23.......................24(Notary Public)    25    My commission expires: .....   HB4947- 3 -LRB104 16917 SPS 30329 b1    (10 ILCS 5/10-10)  (from Ch. 46, par. 10-10)2    Sec. 10-10. Within 24 hours after the receipt of the 3certificate of nomination or nomination papers or proposed 4question of public policy, as the case may be, and the 5objector's petition, the chair of the electoral board other 6than the State Board of Elections shall send a call by 7registered or certified mail: to each of the members of the 8electoral board; to the objector who filed the objector's 9petition; either to the candidate whose certificate of 10nomination or nomination papers are objected to or to the 11principal proponent or attorney for proponents of a question 12of public policy, as the case may be, whose petitions are 13objected to; to the election authority to whom the ballot is 14certified; and to the appropriate county clerk. The chair of 15the electoral board other than the State Board of Elections 16shall also cause the sheriff of the county or counties in which 17such officers and persons reside to serve a copy of such call 18upon each of such officers and persons, except that the chair 19shall not cause service upon any person who has filed a waiver 20of personal service in accordance with Section 7-10.4, and the 21chair shall cause the proper local election official to 22provide notice of the call by conspicuous posting on a website 23maintained by the unit of local government associated with the 24proper local election official, or, if the unit of local 25government does not maintain a website, by conspicuous posting 26at the principal office of the unit of local government, and   HB4947- 4 -LRB104 16917 SPS 30329 b1the posting shall be made promptly and no later than 24 hours 2after the proper local election official receives the call and 3shall remain continuously posted until the conclusion of the 4hearing on the objection, which call shall set out the fact 5that the electoral board is required to meet to hear and pass 6upon the objections to nominations made for the office, 7designating it, and shall state the day, hour and place at 8which the electoral board shall meet for the purpose, which 9place shall be in the county court house in the county in the 10case of the County Officers Electoral Board, the Municipal 11Officers Electoral Board, the Township Officers Electoral 12Board or the Education Officers Electoral Board, except that 13the Municipal Officers Electoral Board, the Township Officers 14Electoral Board, and the Education Officers Electoral Board 15may meet at the location where the governing body of the 16municipality, township, or community college district, 17respectively, holds its regularly scheduled meetings, if that 18location is available; provided that voter records may be 19removed from the offices of an election authority only at the 20discretion and under the supervision of the election 21authority. In those cases where the State Board of Elections 22is the electoral board designated under Section 10-9, the 23chair of the State Board of Elections shall, within 24 hours 24after the receipt of the certificate of nomination or 25nomination papers or petitions for a proposed amendment to 26Article IV of the Constitution or proposed statewide question   HB4947- 5 -LRB104 16917 SPS 30329 b1of public policy, send a call by registered or certified mail 2to the objector who files the objector's petition, and either 3to the candidate whose certificate of nomination or nomination 4papers are objected to or to the principal proponent or 5attorney for proponents of the proposed Constitutional 6amendment or statewide question of public policy and shall 7state the day, hour, and place at which the electoral board 8shall meet for the purpose, which place may be in the Capitol 9Building or in the principal or permanent branch office of the 10State Board. The day of the meeting shall not be less than 3 11nor more than 5 days after the receipt of the certificate of 12nomination or nomination papers and the objector's petition by 13the chair of the electoral board.14    The electoral board shall have the power to administer 15oaths and to subpoena and examine witnesses and, at the 16request of either party and only upon a vote by a majority of 17its members, may authorize the chair to issue subpoenas 18requiring the attendance of witnesses and subpoenas duces 19tecum requiring the production of such books, papers, records 20and documents as may be evidence of any matter under inquiry 21before the electoral board, in the same manner as witnesses 22are subpoenaed in the Circuit Court.23    Service of such subpoenas shall be made by any sheriff or 24other person in the same manner as in cases in such court and 25the fees of such sheriff shall be the same as is provided by 26law, and shall be paid by the objector or candidate who causes   HB4947- 6 -LRB104 16917 SPS 30329 b1the issuance of the subpoena. In case any person so served 2shall knowingly neglect or refuse to obey any such subpoena, 3or to testify, the electoral board shall at once file a 4petition in the circuit court of the county in which such 5hearing is to be heard, or has been attempted to be heard, 6setting forth the facts, of such knowing refusal or neglect, 7and accompanying the petition with a copy of the citation and 8the answer, if one has been filed, together with a copy of the 9subpoena and the return of service thereon, and shall apply 10for an order of court requiring such person to attend and 11testify, and forthwith produce books and papers, before the 12electoral board. Any circuit court of the state, excluding the 13judge who is sitting on the electoral board, upon such showing 14shall order such person to appear and testify, and to 15forthwith produce such books and papers, before the electoral 16board at a place to be fixed by the court. If such person shall 17knowingly fail or refuse to obey such order of the court 18without lawful excuse, the court shall punish him or her by 19fine and imprisonment, as the nature of the case may require 20and may be lawful in cases of contempt of court.21    The electoral board on the first day of its meeting shall 22adopt rules of procedure for the introduction of evidence and 23the presentation of arguments and may, in its discretion, 24provide for the filing of briefs by the parties to the 25objection or by other interested persons.26    In the event of a State Electoral Board hearing on   HB4947- 7 -LRB104 16917 SPS 30329 b1objections to a petition for an amendment to Article IV of the 2Constitution pursuant to Section 3 of Article XIV of the 3Constitution, or to a petition for a question of public policy 4to be submitted to the voters of the entire State, the 5certificates of the county clerks and boards of election 6commissioners showing the results of the random sample of 7signatures on the petition shall be prima facie valid and 8accurate, and shall be presumed to establish the number of 9valid and invalid signatures on the petition sheets reviewed 10in the random sample, as prescribed in Section 28-11 and 28-12 11of this Code. Either party, however, may introduce evidence at 12such hearing to dispute the findings as to particular 13signatures. In addition to the foregoing, in the absence of 14competent evidence presented at such hearing by a party 15substantially challenging the results of a random sample, or 16showing a different result obtained by an additional sample, 17this certificate of a county clerk or board of election 18commissioners shall be presumed to establish the ratio of 19valid to invalid signatures within the particular election 20jurisdiction.21    The electoral board shall take up the question as to 22whether or not the certificate of nomination or nomination 23papers or petitions are in proper form, and whether or not they 24were filed within the time and under the conditions required 25by law, and whether or not they are the genuine certificate of 26nomination or nomination papers or petitions which they   HB4947- 8 -LRB104 16917 SPS 30329 b1purport to be, and whether or not in the case of the 2certificate of nomination in question it represents accurately 3the decision of the caucus or convention issuing it, and in 4general shall decide whether or not the certificate of 5nomination or nominating papers or petitions on file are valid 6or whether the objections thereto should be sustained and the 7decision of a majority of the electoral board shall be final 8subject to judicial review as provided in Section 10-10.1. The 9electoral board must state its findings in writing and must 10state in writing which objections, if any, it has sustained. A 11copy of the decision shall be served upon the parties to the 12proceedings in open proceedings before the electoral board. If 13a party does not appear for receipt of the decision, the 14decision shall be deemed to have been served on the absent 15party on the date when a copy of the decision is personally 16delivered or on the date when a copy of the decision is 17deposited in the United States mail, in a sealed envelope or 18package, with postage prepaid, addressed to each party 19affected by the decision or to such party's attorney of 20record, if any, at the address on record for such person in the 21files of the electoral board. 22    Upon the expiration of the period within which a 23proceeding for judicial review must be commenced under Section 2410-10.1, the electoral board shall, unless a proceeding for 25judicial review has been commenced within such period, 26transmit, by registered or certified mail, a certified copy of   HB4947- 9 -LRB104 16917 SPS 30329 b1its ruling, together with the original certificate of 2nomination or nomination papers or petitions and the original 3objector's petition, to the officer or board with whom the 4certificate of nomination or nomination papers or petitions, 5as objected to, were on file and to the election authority to 6whom the ballot is certified and the appropriate county clerk, 7and such officer or board shall abide by and comply with the 8ruling so made to all intents and purposes.9(Source: P.A. 103-467, eff. 8-4-23.)